Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.290

Compliance—Violations—Penalties.

(1) The director shall have the responsibility for assuring compliance with the provisions of this chapter. An alien bank that conducts business in this state in violation of any provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and in addition thereto shall be liable in the sum of one hundred dollars per day that each such offense continues, such sum to be recovered by the attorney general in a civil action in the name of the state.

(2) Every person who shall knowingly subscribe to or make or cause to be made any false entry in the books of any alien bank office or bureau doing business in this state pursuant to this chapter or shall knowingly subscribe to or exhibit any false or fictitious paper or security, instrument or paper, with the intent to deceive any person authorized to examine into the affairs of any such office or bureau or shall make, state or publish any false statement of the amount of the assets or liabilities of any such office or bureau is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Every director or member of the governing body, officer, employee or agent of such alien bank operating an office or bureau in this state who conceals or destroys any fact or otherwise suppresses any evidence relating to a violation of this chapter is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4) Any person who transacts business in this state on behalf of an alien bank which is subject to the provisions of this chapter, but which is not authorized to transact such business pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and in addition thereto shall be liable in the sum of one hundred dollars per day for each day that such offense continues, such sum to be recovered by the attorney general in a civil action in the name of the state.

[ 2003 c 53 s 189; 1994 c 92 s 99; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 29. Formerly RCW 30.42.290.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.